Louisiana, session 2026, HB246.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 46:2605(B)(4) and (37) and 2605.1(B)(2) and (16) are hereby
amended and reenacted and R.S. 46:2605(B)(31) and 2605.1(B)(22) are hereby enacted to
read as follows:
§2605. Children's Cabinet Advisory Board
* * *
B. The advisory board shall be composed of the following members:
* * *
(4) A representative from the Louisiana Maternal and Child Health
Coalition. The superintendent of the Louisiana State Police or his designee.
* * *
(31) A representative of the Family Road of Greater Baton Rouge.
* * *
(37) A representative of the Louisiana Association of Childcare Agencies A
representative of the Child Care Association of Louisiana.
* * *
Page 1 of 2
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 246 ENROLLED
§2605.1. Council on the Status of Grandparents Raising Grandchildren
* * *
B. The council shall be composed of the following members:
* * *
(2) Three members One member representing the Department of Children
and Family Services appointed by the secretary of the department, one of whom shall
be a representative of the kinship care subsidy program, one of whom shall be a
representative of the Supplemental Nutrition Assistance Program, and one of whom
department who shall be a representative of the foster care program.
* * *
(16) One member representing and appointed by LouisianaChildren.org.
One member representing the Supplemental Nutrition Assistance Program appointed
by the secretary of the department or agency administering the program.
* * *
(22) One member representing the Kinship Care Subsidy Program appointed
by the secretary of the department or agency administering the program.
* * *
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 2 of 2
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.